District of Columbia statutes.
32-1231.14

Construction.

This chapter shall not be construed to preempt, limit, diminish, or otherwise affect any other provision of law relating to sex discrimination or pregnancy or in any way to diminish the coverage for pregnancy, childbirth, or a related medical condition.

Mar. 3, 2015, D.C. Law 20-168, § 15, 61 DCR 11368

History